Utah statutes.
17-27a-517.   County approval of elderly residential facilities.

(1)  Upon application for a permit to establish a residential facility for elderly persons in any area where residential dwellings are allowed, except an area zoned to permit exclusively single-family dwellings, the county shall grant the requested permit to the facility if the facility is proposed outside of a zone regulated exclusively for single-family homes and shall otherwise comply with Section 17-27a-518 if the facility is proposed in a land use zone regulated exclusively for single-family homes.

(2)  The use granted and permitted by this section is nontransferable and terminates if the structure is devoted to a use other than a residential facility for elderly persons or if the structure fails to comply with the ordinances adopted under this section.

(3)  If a county has not adopted ordinances under this section at the time an application for a permit to establish a residential facility for elderly persons is made, the county shall grant the permit if it is established that the criteria set forth in this part have been met by the facility.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

